Nebraska, session 109, LB950.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 44-5437, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
44-5437 (1)(a) On or before November 1, 2025, the department shall
approve a single uniform prior authorization request form for
prescription drugs, devices, and durable medical equipment and a single
uniform prior authorization request form for all other health care
services. The uniform prior authorization request forms shall not exceed
two printed pages in length. This two-page limit does not apply to
information or documentation required by the utilization review agent, as
published in accordance with subsection (1) of section 44-5434, or a
health care provider's notes or documentation submitted in support of a
prior authorization request.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2026, except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, (i) health care providers shall use only the approved
uniform prior authorization request forms; and (ii) utilization review
agents shall accept and process prior authorization requests submitted
using such forms. :
(i) All health care providers shall use only the approved uniform
prior authorization request forms; and
(ii) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all
utilization review agents shall accept and process prior authorization
requests submitted using such forms.
(c) This subsection does not prohibit a utilization review agent
from using a prior authorization methodology that uses an Internet
webpage, an Internet webpage portal, or a similar web-based system if the
methodology is consistent with the uniform prior authorization request
forms approved by the department pursuant to this subsection.
(2)(a) (2) A utilization review agent may request from the
department an exemption from the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section if the utilization review agent implements and maintains a prior
authorization application programming interface pursuant to 45 C.F.R.
-2-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
156.223(b) or other electronic prior authorization methodology that
automates and standardizes the prior authorization process for patients,
health care providers, and health carriers. A utilization review agent
shall provide notice to health care providers at least ninety days prior
to implementing a prior authorization application programming interface
or other electronic prior authorization methodology under this
subsection.
(b) Within ninety days after the date of receipt of the notice
described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section, a health care provider
shall use only the prior authorization application programming interface
or other approved electronic prior authorization methodology for prior
authorization requests. Upon a request from a health care provider, a
utilization review agent may grant an extension of time for good cause.
Sec. 2. Section 81-6,123, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,123 Sections 81-6,123 to 81-6,128 81-6,126 shall be known and
may be cited as the Population Health Information Act.
Sec. 3. Section 81-6,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,125 (1) The purpose of the Population Health Information Act is
to designate a health information exchange to provide the data
infrastructure needed to assist in creating a healthier Nebraska and
operating the electronic health records initiative.
(2) The designated health information exchange shall:
(a) Aggregate clinical information from health care entities needed
to support the operation of the medical assistance program under the
Medical Assistance Act;
(b) Act as the designated entity for purposes of access to and
analysis of health data;
(c) Collect and analyze data for purposes of informing the
Legislature, the department, health care providers, and health care
-3-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
entities as to the cost of, access to, and quality of health care in
Nebraska;
(d) Act as a collector and reporter of public health data for
registry submissions, electronic laboratory reporting, immunization
reporting, and syndromic surveillance from an electronic health record,
which does not include claims data; and
(e) Enable any health care provider or health care entity to real
time access information available within the designated health
information exchange to evaluate and monitor care and treatment of a
patient in accordance with the privacy and security provisions set forth
in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, Public Law 104-191.
(3)(a) On or before January 1, 2027 September 30, 2021, each health
care facility listed in subdivision (b) of this subsection shall
participate in the designated health information exchange through sharing
of clinical information. Such clinical information shall include the
clinical data that the health care facility captured in its existing
electronic health record as permitted by state and federal laws, rules,
and regulations. Any patient health information shared with the
designated health information exchange as determined by the rules and
regulations policies adopted by the Health Information Technology Board
shall be provided in accordance with the privacy and security provisions
set forth in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996 and regulations adopted under the act.
(b) This subsection applies to an ambulatory surgical center, a
critical access hospital, a general acute hospital, a health clinic, a
hospital, an intermediate care facility, a long-term care hospital, a
mental health substance use treatment center, a PACE center, a pharmacy,
a psychiatric or mental hospital, a public health clinic, or a
rehabilitation hospital, as such terms are defined in the Health Care
Facility Licensure Act, or a diagnostic, laboratory, or imaging center.
-4-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
(c) This subsection does not apply to (i) a state-owned or state-
operated facility or (ii) an assisted-living facility, a nursing
facility, or a skilled nursing facility, as such terms are defined in the
Health Care Facility Licensure Act.
(d) Any connection established by July 1, 2021, between a health
care facility and the designated health information exchange to
facilitate such participation shall be at no cost to the participating
health care facility.
(e) A health care facility may apply to the board for a waiver from
the requirement to participate under this subsection due to a
technological burden. The board shall review the application and
determine whether to waive the requirement. If the board waives the
requirement for a health care facility, the board shall review the waiver
annually to determine if the health care facility continues to qualify
for the waiver.
(e) (f) The board shall not require a health care facility to
purchase or contract for an electronic records management system or
service.
(4)(a) On or before January 1, 2022, each health insurance plan
shall participate in the designated health information exchange through
sharing of information. Subject to subsection (5) of this section, such
information shall be determined by rules and regulations policies adopted
by the Health Information Technology Board. Such information shall not
include claims data or any other data used for billing, payment, or
adjudication purposes.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Health insurance plan includes any group or individual sickness
and accident insurance policy, health maintenance organization contract,
subscriber contract, employee medical, surgical, or hospital care benefit
plan, or self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by
federal law; and
-5-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
(ii) Health insurance plan does not include (A) accident-only,
disability-income, hospital confinement indemnity, dental, hearing,
vision, or credit insurance, (B) coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance, (C) insurance provided as a supplement to medicare,
(D) insurance arising from workers' compensation provisions, (E)
automobile medical payment insurance, (F) insurance policies that provide
coverage for a specified disease or any other limited benefit coverage,
or (G) insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard
to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in any
liability insurance policy.
(5) The designated health information exchange and the department
shall enter into an agreement to allow the designated health information
exchange to collect, aggregate, analyze, report, and release de-
identified data, as defined by the federal Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, that is derived from the administration
of the medical assistance program. Such written agreement shall be
executed no later than September 30, 2021.
(6) In addition to the right to opt out as provided in section
71-2454, an individual shall have the right to opt out of the designated
health information exchange or the sharing of information required under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The designated health
information exchange shall adopt a patient opt-out rules and regulations
policy consistent with the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996 and other applicable federal requirements.
Such rules and regulations policy shall not apply to mandatory public
health reporting requirements.
Sec. 4. Section 81-6,127, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,127 (1) The Health Information Technology Board is created. The
board shall have seventeen members. Except for members designated in
subdivision (2)(o) of this section, the members shall be appointed by the
-6-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
Governor with the approval of a majority of the members of the
Legislature. The members may begin to serve immediately following
appointment and prior to approval by the Legislature. The members shall
be appointed by February 1, 2021, and the board shall begin meeting on or
before April 1, 2021.
(2) Members designated under subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), (g),
(h), and (i) of this subsection shall hold a credential under the Uniform
Credentialing Act. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section, the board shall consist of:
(a) One individual who has experience in operating the prescription
drug monitoring program created under section 71-2454;
(b) Two physicians, one of whom shall be a family practice
physician, who are in active practice and in good standing with the
Department of Health and Human Services appointed from a list of
physicians provided by a statewide organization representing physicians;
(c) One pharmacist who is in active practice and in good standing
with the department appointed from a list of pharmacists provided by a
statewide organization representing pharmacists;
(d) One alcohol and drug counselor providing services for a state-
licensed alcohol and drug abuse addiction treatment program;
(e) One health care provider who is board-certified in pain
management;
(f) One hospital administrator appointed from a list of hospital
administrators provided by a statewide organization representing hospital
administrators;
(g) One dentist who is in active practice and in good standing with
the department appointed from a list of dentists provided by a statewide
organization representing dentists;
(h) One nurse practitioner who is in active practice and in good
standing with the department authorized to prescribe medication appointed
from a list of nurse practitioners authorized to prescribe medication
-7-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
provided by a statewide organization representing such nurse
practitioners;
(i) One veterinarian who is in active practice and in good standing
with the department appointed from a list of veterinarians provided by a
statewide organization representing veterinarians;
(j) Two representatives One representative of the Department of
Health and Human Services including one representative from the Division
of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human
Services;
(k) One representative of a delegate as defined in section 71-2454;
(l) One health care payor as defined in section 25-21,247 or an
employee of a health care payor;
(m) One credentialed health information management professional
appointed from a list of such professionals provided by a statewide
organization representing such professionals;
(n) One representative of the statewide health information exchange
described in section 71-2455; and
(o) The chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of
the Legislature and the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of
the Legislature, both of whom are nonvoting, ex officio members; and .
(p) One representative of an insurer, as defined in section 44-103,
who offers at least one health insurance plan as defined in section
81-6,125.
(3) Except for members designated in subdivisions (2)(a) and (o) of
this section:
(a) A minimum of three members shall be appointed from each
congressional district;
(b) Each member shall be appointed for a five-year term beginning on
April 1, 2021, and may serve for any number of such terms;
(c) Any member appointed prior to April 1, 2021, shall begin to
serve immediately upon appointment and continue serving for the term
-8-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
beginning on April 1, 2021; and
(d) Any vacancy in membership, other than by expiration of a term,
shall be filled within ninety days by the Governor by appointment for the
vacant position as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If, after appointment, the classification of a member's
credential changes or a member's credential classification is terminated
and if such credential was a qualification for appointment, the member
shall be permitted to continue to serve as a member of the board until
the expiration of the term for which appointed unless the member loses
the credential due to disciplinary action.
(5) The members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary
expenses incurred in serving on the board as provided in section 71-2455.
(6) A simple majority of members shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of all business.
Sec. 5. Section 81-6,128, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,128 (1) The Health Information Technology Board shall:
(a) Establish criteria for data collection and disbursement by the
statewide health information exchange described in section 71-2455 and
the prescription drug monitoring program created under section 71-2454 to
improve the quality of information provided to clinicians;
(b) Evaluate and ensure that the statewide health information
exchange is meeting technological standards for reporting of data for the
prescription drug monitoring program, including the data to be collected
and reported and the frequency of data collection and disbursement;
(c) Provide the governance oversight necessary to ensure that any
health information in the statewide health information exchange and the
prescription drug monitoring program may be accessed, used, or disclosed
only in accordance with the privacy and security protections set forth in
the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder. All protected
-9-

LB950 LB950
2026 2026
health information is privileged, is not a public record, and may be
withheld from the public pursuant to section 84-712.05; and
(d) Provide recommendations to the statewide health information
exchange on any other matters referred to the board.
(2) The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
policies and procedures necessary to carry out the Population Health
Information Act its duties.
(3) The authority of the board to direct the use or release of data
under this section or section 71-2454 shall apply only to requests
submitted to the board after September 1, 2021.
(4) The board may hold meetings by telecommunication or electronic
communication subject to the Open Meetings Act. Any official action or
vote of the members of the board shall be preserved in the records of the
board.
(5) By November 15, 2021, and November 15 of each year thereafter,
the board shall develop and submit an annual report to the Governor and
the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature regarding
considerations undertaken, decisions made, accomplishments, and other
relevant information. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically.
Sec. 6. Original sections 81-6,123, 81-6,125, 81-6,127, and
81-6,128, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 44-5437,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-10-